Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201885-2428
Commission; report; contents.

On or before November 1 of each year, the commission shall submit electronically a report to the Governor and the Legislature containing:

(1) The number of claims made against the Guaranty Recovery Cash Fund;

(2) The institutions against which the claims are made;

(3) The number of claims that are approved and the associated payouts from the funds;

(4) The number of claims that are denied; and

(5) The amount of money in the Guaranty Recovery Cash Fund used to reimburse the Nebraska Opportunity Grant Fund.

Laws 2017, LB512, § 37.